Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8093. LAKEHAVEN MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8093.0101. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "City" means the City of Farmersville, Texas.

(3) "District" means the Lakehaven Municipal Utility District.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 8093.0102. NATURE AND PURPOSES OF DISTRICT. (a) The district is a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(b) The district is created to accomplish the purposes of:

(1) a municipal utility district as provided by general law and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution; and

(2) Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, that relate to the construction, acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8093.0201. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the district is created.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 8093.0202. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 8093.0203. AUTHORITY FOR ROAD PROJECTS. Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may design, acquire, construct, finance, issue bonds for, improve, operate, maintain, and convey to this state, a county, or a municipality for operation and maintenance macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 8093.0204. ROAD STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS. (a) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards and regulations of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the road project is located.

(b) If a road project is not located in the corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, the road project must meet all applicable construction standards and regulations of each county in which the road project is located.

(c) If the state will maintain and operate the road, the Texas Transportation Commission must approve the plans and specifications of the road project.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS

Sec. 8093.0301. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. (a) Except as provided by Section 8093.0303, the district may issue bonds or other obligations payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, revenue, contract payments, grants, or other district money, or any combination of those sources, to pay for a road project authorized by Section 8093.0203.

(b) The district may not issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes to finance a road project unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(c) At the time of issuance, the total principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance road projects and payable from ad valorem taxes may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 8093.0302. TAXES FOR BONDS. At the time the district issues bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, the board shall provide for the annual imposition of a continuing direct ad valorem tax, without limit as to rate or amount, while all or part of the bonds are outstanding.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 8093.0303. CONDITION PRECEDENT TO ISSUING BONDS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The district may not issue bonds or other obligations under this subchapter unless the district has entered into a contract with the city, Collin County, or another entity:

(1) for adequate supplemental police, fire, and emergency services for the district; and

(2) that is approved by the Commissioners Court of Collin County under Subsection (c).

(b) A contract under Subsection (a) may include a provision that the contract takes effect only on the approval of the Commissioners Court of Collin County and the voters in the district voting in an election held for that purpose.

(c) The Commissioners Court of Collin County shall review a contract under Subsection (a) and evaluate the supplemental police, fire, and emergency services provided in the contract. If the commissioners court determines that the contract provides adequate services, the commissioners court shall adopt a resolution stating that the contract has met the requirements of Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. CITY PERMITTING AUTHORITY IN DISTRICT

Sec. 8093.0401. CITY AUTHORITY. (a) The city has exclusive authority in the district to issue all building permits, certificates of occupancy, and any certificate or permit issued by the city relating to business activities.

(b) A fee for a permit or certificate issued by the city for use in the district may not exceed the fees charged for the same permit or certificate issued for use in the corporate limits of the city.

(c) A permit or certificate issued by the city for use in the district is subject to the terms of a development agreement made under Section 212.172, Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (S.B. 2535), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.